Illinois, session 104th, SB2346.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Banking Act is amended by changing 5Sections 18 and 22 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 5/18)  (from Ch. 17, par. 325)7    Sec. 18. Change in control. 8    (a) Before any person, whether acting directly or 9indirectly or through or in concert with one or more persons, 10may cause (i) a change to occur in the ownership of outstanding 11stock of any State bank, whether by sale and purchase, gift, 12bequest or inheritance, or any other means, including the 13acquisition of stock of the State bank by any bank holding 14company, which will result in control or a change in the 15control of the bank, or (ii) a change to occur in the control 16of a holding company having control of the outstanding stock 17of a State bank whether by sale and purchase, gift, bequest or 18inheritance, or any other means, including the acquisition of 19stock of such holding company by any other bank holding 20company, which will result in control or a change in control of 21the bank or holding company, or (iii) a transfer of 22substantially all the assets or liabilities of the State bank, 23the Secretary shall be of the opinion and find:  SB2346- 2 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1        (1) that the general character of proposed management 2    or of the person desiring to purchase substantially all 3    the assets or to assume substantially all the liabilities 4    of the State bank, after the change in control, is such as 5    to assure reasonable promise of successful, safe and sound 6    operation;7        (1.1) that depositors' interests will not be 8    jeopardized by the purchase or assumption and that 9    adequate provision has been made for all liabilities as 10    required for a voluntary liquidation under Section 68 of 11    this Act;12        (2) that the future earnings prospects of the person 13    desiring to purchase substantially all assets or to assume 14    substantially all the liabilities of the State bank, after 15    the proposed change in control, are favorable;16        (2.5) that the future prospects of the institution 17    will not jeopardize the financial stability of the bank or 18    prejudice the interests of the depositors of the bank; 19        (3) that any prior involvement by the persons 20    proposing to obtain control, to purchase substantially all 21    the assets, or to assume substantially all the liabilities 22    of the State bank or by the proposed management personnel 23    with any other financial institution, whether as 24    stockholder, director, officer or customer, was conducted 25    in a safe and sound manner; and26        (4) that if the acquisition is being made by a bank   SB2346- 3 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1    holding company, the acquisition is authorized under the 2    Illinois Bank Holding Company Act of 1957; and .3        (5) that the resulting financial institution after a 4    change in control, a purchase of substantially all assets, 5    or the assumption of substantially all the liabilities of 6    a State bank is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance 7    Corporation and agrees to be subject to 2 U.S.C. 2901 et 8    seq. 9    (b) Any person desiring to purchase control of an existing 10State bank, to purchase substantially all the assets, or to 11assume substantially all the liabilities of the State bank 12shall, prior to that purchase, submit to the Secretary:13        (1) a statement of financial worth;14        (2) satisfactory evidence that any prior involvement 15    by the persons and the proposed management personnel with 16    any other financial institution, whether as stockholder, 17    director, officer or customer, was conducted in a safe and 18    sound manner; and19        (3) such other relevant information as the Secretary 20    may request to substantiate the findings under subsection 21    (a) of this Section.22    A person who has submitted information to the Secretary 23pursuant to this subsection (b) is under a continuing 24obligation until the Secretary takes action on the application 25to immediately supplement that information if there are any 26material changes in the information previously furnished or if   SB2346- 4 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1there are any material changes in any circumstances that may 2affect the Secretary's opinion and findings. In addition, a 3person submitting information under this subsection shall 4notify the Secretary of the date when the change in control is 5finally effected.6    The Secretary may impose such terms and conditions on the 7approval of the change in control application as he deems 8necessary or appropriate.9    If an applicant, whose application for a change in control 10has been approved pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section, 11fails to effect the change in control within 180 days after the 12date of the Secretary's approval, the Secretary shall revoke 13that approval unless a request has been submitted, in writing, 14to the Secretary for an extension and the request has been 15approved.16    (b-1) Any person, whether acting directly or indirectly or 17through or in concert with one or more persons, who obtains 18ownership of stock of an existing State bank or stock of a 19holding company that controls the State bank by gift, bequest, 20or inheritance such that ownership of the stock would 21constitute control of the State bank or holding company may 22obtain title and ownership of the stock, but may not exercise 23management or control of the business and affairs of the bank 24or vote his or her shares so as to exercise management or 25control unless and until the Secretary approves an application 26for the change of control as provided in subsection (b) of this   SB2346- 5 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1Section.2    (b-3) The provisions of this Section do not apply to an 3established holding company acquiring control of a State bank 4if the transaction is subject to approval under Section 3 of 5the federal Bank Holding Company Act, the Federal Deposit 6Insurance Act, or the federal Home Owners' Loan Act. 7    (c) Whenever a State bank makes a loan or loans, secured, 8or to be secured, by 25% or more of the outstanding stock of a 9State bank, the president or other chief executive officer of 10the lending bank shall promptly report such fact to the 11Secretary upon obtaining knowledge of such loan or loans, 12except that no report need be made in those cases where the 13borrower has been the owner of record of the stock for a period 14of one year or more, or the stock is that of a newly organized 15bank prior to its opening.16    (d) The reports required by subsection (b) of this Section 1718, other than those relating to a transfer of assets or 18assumption of liabilities, shall contain the following 19information to the extent that it is known by the person making 20the report: (1) the number of shares involved; (2) the names of 21the sellers (or transferors); (3) the names of the purchasers 22(or transferees); (4) the names of the beneficial owners if 23the shares are registered in another name: (5) the purchase 24price, if applicable; (6) the total number of shares owned by 25the sellers (or transferors), the purchasers (or transferees) 26and the beneficial owners both immediately before and after   SB2346- 6 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1the transaction; and, (7) in the case of a loan, the name of 2the borrower, the amount of the loan, the name of the bank 3issuing the stock securing the loan and the number of shares 4securing the loan. In addition to the foregoing, such reports 5shall contain such other information which is requested by the 6Secretary to inform the Secretary of the effect of the 7transaction upon control of the bank whose stock is involved.8    (d-1) The reports required by subsection (b) of this 9Section 18 that relate to purchase of assets and assumption of 10liabilities shall contain the following information to the 11extent that it is known by the person making the report: (1) 12the value, amount, and description of the assets transferred; 13(2) the amount, type, and to whom each type of liabilities are 14owed; (3) the names of the purchasers (or transferees); (4) 15the names of the beneficial owners if the shares of a purchaser 16or transferee are registered in another name; (5) the purchase 17price, if applicable; and, (6) in the case of a loan obtained 18to effect a purchase, the name of the borrower, the amount and 19terms of the loan, and the description of the assets securing 20the loan. In addition to the foregoing, these reports shall 21contain any other information that is requested by the 22Secretary to inform the Secretary of the effect of the 23transaction upon the bank from which assets are purchased or 24liabilities are transferred.25    (e) Whenever such a change as described in subsection (a) 26of this Section 18 occurs, each State bank shall report   SB2346- 7 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1promptly to the Secretary any changes or replacement of its 2chief executive officer or of any director occurring in the 3next 12 month period, including in its report a statement of 4the past and current business and professional affiliations of 5the new chief executive officer or directors.6    (f) (Blank). 7    (g)(1) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this 8subsection (g), the Secretary shall not approve an application 9for a change in control if upon consummation of the change in 10control the persons applying for the change in control, 11including any affiliates of the persons applying, would 12control 30% or more of the total amount of deposits which are 13located in this State at insured depository institutions. For 14purposes of this subsection (g), the words "insured depository 15institution" shall mean State banks, national banks, and 16insured savings associations. For purposes of this subsection 17(g), the word "deposits" shall have the meaning ascribed to 18that word in Section 3(l) of the Federal Deposit Insurance 19Act. For purposes of this subsection (g), the total amount of 20deposits which are considered to be located in this State at 21insured depository institutions shall equal the sum of all 22deposits held at the main banking premises and branches in the 23State of Illinois of State banks, national banks, or insured 24savings associations. For purposes of this subsection (g), the 25word "affiliates" shall have the meaning ascribed to that word 26in Section 35.2 of this Act.   SB2346- 8 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1    (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of 2this subsection, the Secretary may approve an application for 3a change in control for a bank that is in default or in danger 4of default. Except in those instances in which an application 5for a change in control is for a bank that is in default or in 6danger of default, the Secretary may not approve a change in 7control which does not meet the requirements of paragraph (1) 8of this subsection. The Secretary may not waive the provisions 9of paragraph (1) of this subsection, whether pursuant to 10Section 3(d) of the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 or 11Section 44(d) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, except as 12expressly provided in this paragraph (2) of this subsection.13    (h) As used in this Section: 14    "Control" means the power, directly or indirectly, to 15direct the management or policies of the bank or to vote 25% or 16more of the outstanding stock of the bank. If there is any 17question as to whether a change in control application should 18be filed, the question shall be resolved in favor of filing the 19application with the Secretary.20    "Substantially all" the assets or liabilities of a State 21bank means that portion of the assets or liabilities of a State 22bank such that their purchase or transfer will materially 23impair the ability of the State bank to continue successful, 24safe, and sound operations or to continue as a going concern or 25would cause the bank to lose its federal deposit insurance.26    "Purchase" includes a transfer by gift, bequest,   SB2346- 9 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1inheritance, or any other means.2    As used in this Section, a person is acting in concert if 3that person is acting in concert under federal laws or 4regulations. 5(Source: P.A. 100-888, eff. 8-14-18; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 6    (205 ILCS 5/22)  (from Ch. 17, par. 329)7    Sec. 22. Merger procedure; resulting State bank. The 8merger procedure required of a State bank where there is to be 9a resulting State bank by consolidation or merger shall be:10        (1) The board of directors of each merging bank or 11    insured savings association shall, by a majority of the 12    entire board, approve a merger agreement that shall 13    contain:14            (a) The name of each merging bank or insured 15        savings association and its location and a list of 16        each merging bank's or insured savings association's 17        stockholders as of the date of the merger agreement;18            (b) With respect to the resulting bank (i) its 19        name and place of business; (ii) the amount of Tier 1 20        capital; (iii) the classes and the number of shares of 21        stock and the par value of each share; (iv) the 22        designation of the continuing bank and the charter 23        which is to be the charter of the resulting bank, 24        together with the amendments to the continuing charter 25        and to the continuing by-laws; and (v) a detailed   SB2346- 10 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1        financial statement showing the assets and liabilities 2        after the proposed merger or consolidation;3            (c) Provisions stating the method, terms and 4        conditions of carrying the merger into effect, 5        including the manner of converting the shares of the 6        merging banks or insured savings association into the 7        cash, shares of stock or other securities of any 8        corporation or other property, or any combination of 9        the foregoing, stated in the merger agreement as to be 10        received by the stockholders of each merging bank or 11        insured savings association;12            (d) A statement that the agreement is subject to 13        approval by the Commissioner and by the stockholders 14        of each merging bank or insured savings association 15        and that whether approved or disapproved the merging 16        banks or insured savings association will pay the 17        Commissioner's expenses of examination;18            (e) Provisions governing the manner of disposing 19        of the shares of the resulting bank not taken by the 20        dissenting stockholders of the merging banks or 21        insured savings association; and22            (f) Such other provisions as the Commissioner may 23        reasonably require to enable him to discharge his 24        duties with respect to the merger.25        (2) After approval by the board of directors of each 26    bank or insured savings association, the merger agreement   SB2346- 11 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1    shall be submitted to the Commissioner for approval, 2    together with certified copies of the authorizing 3    resolutions of each board of directors showing approval by 4    a majority of the entire board of each bank or insured 5    savings association.6        (3) After receipt by the Commissioner of the papers 7    specified in paragraph (2), he shall approve or disapprove 8    the merger agreement. The Commissioner shall not approve 9    the merger agreement unless he shall be of the opinion and 10    shall find that:11            (a) That the resulting bank meets the requirements 12        of this Act for the formation of a new bank at the 13        proposed main banking premises of the resulting bank;14            (b) That the same matters exist with respect to 15        the resulting bank which would have been required 16        under Section 10 of this Act for the organization of a 17        new bank;18            (c) That the merger agreement is fair to all 19        persons affected; and20            (d) That the resulting bank will be operated in a 21        safe and sound manner; and .22            (e) the resulting bank is insured by the Federal 23        Deposit Insurance Corporation and agrees to operate 24        subject to 2 U.S.C. 2901 et seq. 25        If the Commissioner disapproves an agreement he shall 26    state his objections and give an opportunity to the   SB2346- 12 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1    merging banks to amend the merger agreement to obviate 2    such objections.3        (4) The Commissioner may impose such terms and 4    conditions on the approval of the merger agreement as he 5    deems necessary or appropriate.6        (5) If the Commissioner approves a merger agreement, 7    he may revoke that approval if the merger has not been 8    approved by the shareholders in accordance with Section 23 9    within 180 days after the date of the Commissioner's 10    approval, unless a request has been submitted, in writing, 11    to the Commissioner for an extension and the request has 12    been approved.13        (6) The board of directors of a bank or insured 14    savings association is under a continuing obligation until 15    the Commissioner takes action on the application to 16    furnish additional information if there are any material 17    changes in circumstances after the merger agreement has 18    been submitted which may affect the Commissioner's 19    opinions and findings.20(Source: P.A. 92-483, eff. 8-23-01.) 21    Section 10. The Savings Bank Act is amended by changing 22Sections 8004, 8010, and 8015 as follows: 23    (205 ILCS 205/8004)  (from Ch. 17, par. 7308-4)24    Sec. 8004. Merger; adoption of plan.   SB2346- 13 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1    (a) Any depository institution may merge into a savings 2bank operating under this Act, and a savings bank operating 3under this Act may merge into a depository institution. The 4board of directors of each merging depository institution, by 5resolution adopted by a majority vote of all members of the 6board, must approve the plan of merger.7    (b) The plan of merger must include the following: 8        (1) The name of each of the merging depository 9    institutions, the name of the continuing savings bank or 10    resulting depository institution, the location of the 11    business office, and the location of the branch offices. 12        (2) With respect to the resulting savings bank or 13    resulting depository institution, the amount of capital, 14    surplus, and reserve for operating expenses; the classes 15    and the number of shares of stock and the par value of each 16    share; the charter and bylaws of the resulting depository 17    institution or savings bank; and a detailed financial 18    Statement showing the assets and liabilities after the 19    proposed merger. 20        (3) Provisions stating the method, terms, and 21    conditions of carrying the merger into effect, including 22    the manner of converting the shares of the merging 23    depository institutions into the cash, shares of stock, or 24    other securities or properties Stated in the merger 25    agreement to be received by the stockholders of each 26    merging depository institution.   SB2346- 14 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1        (4) Provisions governing the manner of disposing of 2    any shares of stock of the resulting savings bank or 3    resulting depository institution that are not taken by the 4    dissenting stockholders of each merging depository 5    institution. 6        (5) Other provisions that appear necessary or 7    desirable or that the Secretary may reasonably require to 8    enable him to discharge his duties with respect to the 9    merger.10    (c) After approval by the board of directors of each 11depository institution, the merger agreement shall be 12submitted to the Secretary for approval, together with the 13certified copies of the authorizing resolutions of each board 14of directors showing approval by a majority of the entire 15board of each merging depository institution. After receipt of 16the items specified herein, the Secretary may make or cause to 17be made an examination of the affairs of each of the merging 18depository institutions and their affiliates and subsidiaries, 19the expense of which is to be paid by the merging depository 20institutions.21    (d) The Secretary may then approve or disapprove the 22proposed merger agreement. The Secretary shall not approve a 23merger agreement unless he finds that: 24        (1) The resulting savings bank meets the requirements 25    of this Act for the formation of a new savings bank at the 26    proposed main office of the resulting savings bank.   SB2346- 15 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1        (2) The same conditions exist with respect to the 2    resulting savings bank that would be required under this 3    Act for the organization of a new savings bank. 4        (3) The merger agreement is fair to all persons 5    affected. 6        (4) The resulting savings bank will be operated in a 7    safe and sound manner.8        (5) The resulting savings bank is insured by the 9    Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and agrees to 10    operate subject to 2 U.S.C. 2901 et seq. 11    (e) If the Secretary disapproves of the proposed merger, 12he shall State his objections in writing and give the merging 13depository institutions a Stated period of time in which to 14amend the plan of merger to address the objections.15(Source: P.A. 97-492, eff. 1-1-12.) 16    (205 ILCS 205/8010)  (from Ch. 17, par. 7308-10)17    Sec. 8010. Procedure to effect sale of all assets. 18    (a) The procedure to effect a sale authorized by Section 198009 of this Act shall be as follows: 20        (1) The board of directors shall adopt a resolution 21    setting forth the terms of the proposed sale and shall 22    submit the plan to the Secretary for his preliminary 23    approval. Upon receipt of approval by the Secretary, the 24    plan shall be submitted to a vote of the members at a 25    special or annual meeting.   SB2346- 16 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1        (2) The terms shall be set forth in the notice of the 2    meeting as prescribed in subsection (b) of Section 4003 of 3    this Act. 4        (3) The proposed sale will be approved by the members 5    or stockholders upon receiving in the affirmative 6    two-thirds or more of the total number of votes that all 7    members or stockholders of the savings bank are entitled 8    to cast. A proposal for the voluntary liquidation of the 9    savings bank may be submitted to the members or 10    stockholders at the same meeting or at any later meeting 11    called for that purpose in accordance with Article 4 of 12    this Act. A report of proceedings, certified by the 13    president or vice president and attested by the secretary 14    of the savings bank, setting forth the terms of the 15    proposed sale, the notice given and the time of its 16    mailing, the vote on the proposal, and the total number of 17    votes that all members or stockholders of the savings bank 18    are entitled to cast, shall be filed with the Secretary.19    (b) If the Secretary finds that the proposed sale is fair 20to all holders of capital, creditors, and other persons 21concerned and provision has been made for the disposition of 22the remaining assets, if any, of the savings bank, as provided 23in this Act for voluntary liquidation, he shall issue to the 24savings bank a certificate of authorization for the sale with 25a copy of the filed report of proceedings attached to the 26certificate.  SB2346- 17 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1    (b-5) A proposed sale shall not be approved by the 2Secretary unless the resulting savings bank is insured by the 3Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and agrees to operate 4subject to 2 U.S.C. 2901 et seq. 5    (c) When the Secretary's certificate is issued, the 6savings bank may complete the sale so authorized; except that 7the savings bank must also have the approval of the Federal 8Deposit Insurance Corporation.9    (d) If the sale includes the name of the savings bank, the 10purchaser shall have the exclusive right to that name for a 11period of 5 years.12(Source: P.A. 97-492, eff. 1-1-12.) 13    (205 ILCS 205/8015)  (from Ch. 17, par. 7308-15)14    Sec. 8015. Change in control. 15    (a) No person, whether acting directly or indirectly or 16through or in concert with one or more persons, may acquire 17control of a savings bank operating under this Act without 18prior approval of the Secretary. The provisions of this 19Section do not apply to an established holding company 20acquiring control of a State savings bank if the transaction 21is subject to approval under the Federal Deposit Insurance 22Act, the federal Home Owners' Loan Act, or Section 3 of the 23federal Bank Holding Company Act. 24    (b) Any person seeking to acquire control of a savings 25bank or subsidiary of a savings bank operating under this Act   SB2346- 18 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1shall submit an application in the form required by the 2Secretary.3    (c) The Secretary may examine the books and records of the 4applicant and related persons, investigate any matter relevant 5to the application, and require the applicant to submit 6additional information and documents. 7    (d) The Secretary shall not approve an acquisition of 8control unless the application and related examination and 9investigation permit the Secretary to find positively on all 10of the following matters:11        (1) The applicant has filed a complete application, 12    has cooperated with all examinations and investigations of 13    the Secretary, and has submitted all information and 14    documents requested by the Secretary.15        (2) The applicant and proposed management have the 16    necessary competence, experience, integrity, and financial 17    ability.18        (3) The business plans of the applicant are consistent 19    with the safe and sound operation of the savings bank and 20    the purposes of this Act.21        (4) The acquisition of control would not be 22    inequitable to members, borrowers or creditors of the 23    savings bank.24        (5) The applicant and proposed management have 25    complied with subsection (f) of this Section.26        (6) The future prospects of the institution will not   SB2346- 19 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1    jeopardize the financial stability of the savings bank or 2    prejudice the interests of the members of the savings 3    bank. 4        (7) The savings bank is or will be insured by the 5    Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and agrees to 6    operate subject to 2 U.S.C. 2901 et seq. 7    (e) Shares of stock or mutual members shares acquired in 8violation of subsection (a) of this Section shall not be voted 9and shall not be counted in calculating the total number of 10shares eligible to vote. In addition to any other action 11authorized under this Act, the Secretary may require 12divestment of shares of stock acquired in violation of this 13Section and may require retirement of the withdrawal value of 14accounts providing mutual member voting shares acquired in 15violation of this Section, in which case the savings bank 16shall pay accrued interest on the retired withdrawal value and 17shall not assess any penalty for early withdrawal.18    (f) An individual, whether acting directly or indirectly 19or through or in concert with one or more persons, shall file 20written notice to the Secretary within 10 days of the 21occurrence of either of the following events:22        (1) becoming, directly or indirectly, the beneficial 23    owner of more than five percent of the voting shares of a 24    savings bank or savings bank holding company; or25        (2) obtaining, directly or indirectly, the power to 26    cast more than five percent of the member votes of a   SB2346- 20 -LRB104 10308 BAB 20382 b1    savings bank or savings bank holding company.2    The requirements of this subsection (f) are separate and 3in addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this 4Section.5    (g) The Secretary may promulgate rules to implement this 6provision, including definitions, form and content of 7application or notice, procedures, exemptions, and 8requirements for approval. 9    (h) As used in this Section, a person is acting in concert 10if that person is acting in concert under federal laws or 11regulations.12(Source: P.A. 100-888, eff. 8-14-18.)